Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5670.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 6a. (1) Notwithstanding the requirements of section 6(1), beginning January 1, 2027, a salaried employee of this state who is a member of the classified state civil service may request that the state pay the employee's wages by any of the following methods: (a) Payment in United States currency. If the employee chooses this method, the employee must receive payment in person at the department of treasury office in Lansing. (b) Direct deposit or electronic transfer to the employee's account at a financial institution. (c) Subject to subsection (2), payment in a digital currency of the employee's choice. (2) This state shall provide an employee described in subsection (1) with not fewer than 6 digital currency options in which the employee's wages may be paid, subject to both of the following conditions: (a) One of the digital currency options must be Bitcoin. (b) The state shall not offer a state-owned or state-controlled digital currency in which the issuance and number of digital tokens or coins is controlled by a national government or central bank. (3) This state shall pay wages to an employee described in subsection (1) in the method that the employee chooses under subsection (1).